Arkansas, session 2025, SB112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas State University - Beebe for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor, ASUB 1 $208,138
(2) IT Pool 9
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
*HAR018*
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(3) Vice Chanc. for Academic Affairs 1 $167,057
(4) Vice Chanc. for Development 1 $156,658
(5) Vice Chanc. for Finance & Admin. 1 $156,658
(6) Vice Chanc. for External & Adv. Prog 1 $156,658
(7) Vice Chanc. for Student Services 1 $156,658
(8) Vice Chanc. for Information Technology 1 $156,658
(9) Director of Campus Operations 3 $143,678
(10) Director of Human Resources/Services 1 $132,733
(11) Dir. of Institutional Research 1 $132,733
(12) Counselor 8 $127,508
(13) Information Systems Manager 1 $127,407
(14) Registrar 1 $122,249
(15) Dir. of Public Rel. & Marketing 1 $122,249
(16) Dir. of Student Financial Aid 1 $122,005
(17) Dean of Students 1 $121,485
(18) Project/Program Administrator 28
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,256
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
(19) Director of Academic Affairs 1 $119,967
(20) Director of Computer Services 1 $119,967
(21) Associate Vice Chancellor 3 $119,881
(22) Director of Distance Learning 1 $119,881
(23) Business Manager 2 $117,181
(24) Controller 1 $117,181
(25) Director of Fiscal Affairs 1 $117,180
(26) Director of Advancement/Cont. Ed. 1 $114,976
(27) Director of Continuing Education 1 $114,976
(28) Director of Student Affairs 1 $114,976
(29) Director of Physical Plant 1 $113,103
(30) Assessment and Planning Coordinator 1 $111,761
(31) Director of Admissions 1 $111,453
(32) Coord. of Student Recruitment 2 $111,362
(33) Industrial Relations Coordinator 1 $108,068
(34) Administrator of Grants & Contracts 1 $105,720
(35) Coordinator of Community Relations 1 $105,124
(36) Job Placement Coordinator 1 $104,457
(37) Registrar/Coordinator of Admissions 1 $98,654
(38) Fiscal Support Pool 7
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(39) Director of Disability Services 1 $91,268
(40) Public Safety Pool 5
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(41) Director of Admin. Support Services 1 $81,473
(42) Benefits Coordinator 1 $78,713
(43) Skilled Trades Pool 11
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(44) Buyer 1 $69,975
(45) HEI Program Coordinator 3 $69,975
(46) Public Information Specialist 1 $69,975
(47) Administrative Support Pool 27
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(48) Financial Aid Analyst 3 $67,284
(49) Library Support Pool 5
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(50) Purchasing Specialist 1 $67,284
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
(51) Student Accounts Officer 1 $67,284
(52) Human Resources Specialist 1 $62,208
(53) Landscape Supervisor 1 $62,208
(54) Records Management Analyst 1 $62,208
(55) Farm Foreman - Institution 1 $59,815
(56) Purchasing Technician 1 $59,815
(57) Laboratory Coordinator 1 $57,515
(58) Equipment Mechanic 1 $55,302
(59) Laboratory Technician 1 $55,302
(60) Student Accounts Specialist 3 $55,302
(61) Maintenance Assistant 4 $51,130
(62) Shipping & Receiving Clerk 1 $45,455
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(63) Faculty 34
Professor/Master Instructor $160,132
Assoc. Professor/Senior Instructor $138,186
Asst. Professor/Advanced Instructor $120,662
Instructor $105,434
(64) Dir. of Adv. Tech. and Allied Health 1 $153,655
(65) Division Chairperson 4 $146,201
(66) Head Librarian 1 $132,733
(67) Special Instructor 2 $111,362
(68) Director of Learning Center 1 $97,356
(69) Dir. of Resource Center 1 $97,356
(70) Student Development Specialist 10 $83,457
(71) Asst. Librarian 1 $82,663
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(72) Faculty 78
Professor/Master Instructor $119,492
Assoc. Professor/Senior Instructor $112,659
Asst. Professor/Advanced Instructor $99,684
Instructor $86,850
(73) Part-Time Faculty 196 $68,625
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
POSITIONS
(74) Project/Program Administrator 2
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,256
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
(75) Student Union Night Manager 1 $64,696
(76) Special Events Coordinator 1 $59,815
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 502

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas State University - Beebe for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two
hundred twenty-five (225) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Beebe, to be payable from
the Arkansas State University - Beebe Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Arkansas State University - Beebe for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $11,529,884
(02) EXTRA HELP 150,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,097,561
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 170,000
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
(06) CONTINGENCY 722,372
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $15,169,817

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas State University - Beebe, to be payable from cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Arkansas State University - Beebe for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,750,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 783,145
(03) OVERTIME 25,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,600,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 9,775,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 300,000
(C) PROF. FEES 850,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,500,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 10,950,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 5,000,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 1,500,000
(09) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 125,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $38,158,145

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018

SB112
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.













01/27/2025 11:40:30 AM HAR018